Hawaii statutes.
§834-2 Definition. The phrase "appropriate
court" as used in the Agreement on Detainers shall, with reference to the
courts of this State, mean the supreme court and the circuit courts. [L 1965, c
160, §2; Supp, §250A-2; HRS §714-2; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next